Wyoming, session 2025, SF0113.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 33-12-120(a) by creating new
paragraphs (xx) and (xxi) and by renumbering (xx) as (xxii)
and 33-12-140 by creating new subsections (d) and (e) are
amended to read:
33-12-120. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xx) "Braiding device" means a clip, comb,
crochet hook, curlers, hairpin, rollers, scissors,
blunt-tipped needles, thread and hair binders;
(xxi) "Practice of natural hair braiding" means
the service of twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending,
locking or braiding a person's hair by hand or with a
braiding device decorative beads or other hair accessories,
the minor trimming of natural hair or hair extensions
incidental to twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending,
locking or braiding hair and the making and lacing of wigs
from natural hair, natural fibers, synthetic fibers or hair
extensions. "Practice of natural hair braiding" includes
the use of topical agents including conditioners, gels,
moisturizers, oils or pomades. "Practice of natural hair
braiding" shall not include the application of dyes,
reactive chemicals or other preparations to alter the color
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0113
ENROLLED ACT NO. 48, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
of a person's hair or to straighten, curl or alter the
structure of a person's hair or the use of chemical hair
joining agents including synthetic tape, keratin bonds or
fusion bonds;
(xx)(xxii) "This act" means W.S. 33-12-119
through 33-12-140.
33-12-140. Exemptions.
(d) This act shall not apply to a person solely
engaged in the practice of natural hair braiding. The
practice of natural hair braiding is not regulated under
this title and is separate and distinct from barbering, the
practice of hair styling and the practice of cosmetology.
(e) Nothing in subsection (d) of this section shall
prohibit the owner of a salon from requiring private
certification of a person engaged in the practice of
natural hair braiding at the owner's salon.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0113
ENROLLED ACT NO. 48, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3